Utah statutes.
32A-12-214 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Unlawful possession by licensees or
permittees.
A licensee or permittee of the commission may not have, possess, store, or
allow consumption on its premises any liquor not purchased from the
department, a state store, or a package agency, except as authorized by
Section 32A-12-213, other provisions of this title, or the rules of the
commission.
